Louisiana, session 2026, HB1101.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1021(introductory paragraph), 1123, 1208(A), 1221(introductory
paragraph), (1)(d), and (3)(d)(introductory paragraph) and (ii), and 1226(A) and
(B)(1)(introductory paragraph) and (3)(a) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
23:1021(14) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1021. Terms defined
As used in this Chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
following terms shall be given have the meaning meanings ascribed to them in this
Section:
* * *
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2199 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1101
(14)(a) "Maximum Medical Improvement" or "MMI" means the employee's
condition is unlikely to improve substantially with or without medical treatment.
(b) The fact that the employee requires or receives medical treatment to
maintain his condition or to manage chronic pain does not prevent a finding of
maximum medical improvement.
* * *
§1123. Disputes as to condition or capacity to work; additional Additional medical
opinion regarding an examination under supervision of the assistant
secretary
If any dispute arises as to the condition of the employee, including but not
limited to the cause of the condition, whether the employee has reached maximum
medical improvement, or the employee's capacity to work, the assistant secretary,
upon application of any party, shall order an additional medical opinion regarding
an examination of the employee to be made by a medical practitioner selected and
appointed by the assistant secretary. The medical examiner shall report his
conclusions from the examination to the assistant secretary and to the parties and
such the report shall be prima facie evidence of the facts therein stated in any
subsequent proceedings under pursuant to this Chapter.
* * *
§1208. Misrepresentations concerning benefit benefits or payments; penalty
A.(1) It shall be unlawful for any person, for the purpose of obtaining or
defeating any benefit or payment under pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter,
either for himself or for any other person, to willfully make a false statement or
representation. The elements required for fraud provided for in this Paragraph are
exclusive and no further requirements are necessary to establish fraud pursuant to
this Section.
(2) Evidence that a false statement or representation does not alter a medical
expert's opinion concerning causation or treatment of an injury or occupational
disease compensable pursuant to this Chapter shall not be considered in defense to
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2199 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1101
fraud as provided for in this Section, if the false statement or representation would
be otherwise prohibited pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
* * *
§1221. Temporary total disability; permanent total disability; supplemental earnings
benefits; permanent partial disability; schedule of payments
Compensation shall be paid under pursuant to this Chapter in accordance
with the following schedule of payments:
(1) Temporary total.
* * *
(d) An award of benefits based on temporary total disability shall cease when
the physical condition of the employee has resolved itself to the point that a
reasonably reliable determination of the extent of disability of the employee may be
made and the employee's physical condition has improved to the point that
continued, regular treatment by a physician is not required of maximum medical
improvement. However, in no event shall benefits based on temporary total
disability exceed a maximum of one hundred fifty-six weeks. Termination of
temporary total disability benefits as provided for in this Paragraph shall not
preclude an award of benefits provided for in Paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of this
Section.
* * *
(3) Supplemental earnings benefits.
* * *
(d) The right to supplemental earnings benefits pursuant to this Paragraph
shall in no event exceed a maximum of five hundred twenty four hundred sixteen
weeks, but shall terminate:
* * *
(ii) After receipt of a maximum of five hundred twenty four hundred sixteen
weeks of benefits, provided that for any week during which the employee is paid any
compensation under pursuant to this Paragraph, the employer shall be entitled to a
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2199 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1101
reduction of one full week of compensation against the maximum number of weeks
for which compensation is payable under pursuant to this Paragraph; however, for
any week during which the employee is paid no supplemental earnings benefits, the
employer shall not be entitled to a reduction against the maximum number of weeks
payable under pursuant to this Paragraph; or
* * *
§1226. Rehabilitation of injured employees
A. When an employee has suffered an injury covered by this Chapter which
precludes the employee from earning wages equal to wages earned prior to the
injury, the employee shall be entitled to prompt vocational rehabilitation services.
Vocational rehabilitation services shall be provided by a licensed professional
vocational rehabilitation counselor, and all such services provided shall be compliant
with the Code of Professional Ethics for Licensed Rehabilitation Counselors as
established by R.S. 37:3441 et seq.
B.(1) The goal of vocational rehabilitation services is to return a worker with
a disability to work suitable gainful employment, with a minimum of retraining, as
soon as possible after an injury occurs. Suitable gainful employment means a
position offered by the employer or identified by the vocational rehabilitation
counselor selected pursuant to this Section that is within the employee's physical
work restrictions and available within the employee's community or a reasonable
geographic area, regardless of whether the specific position is approved by a
physician or offered to the employee. The first appropriate option among the
following must be chosen for the worker:
* * *
(3)(a) The employer shall be responsible for the selection of select a licensed
professional vocational rehabilitation counselor to evaluate and assist the employee
in his job placement or vocational training. Should the employer refuse to provide
these services, or a dispute arises concerning the work of the vocational counselor,
the employee may file a claim with the office to review the need for such services
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2199 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1101
or the quality of services being provided. The employee shall have a right to an
expedited summary proceeding pursuant to R.S. 23:1201.1(K)(8). The workers'
compensation judge shall set a hearing date within three days of receiving the
motion. The hearing shall be held not less than ten, nor more than thirty days, after
the employer or payor receives notice, delivered by certified or registered mail, of
the employee's motion. The workers' compensation judge shall provide notice of the
hearing date to the employer and payor at the same time and in the same manner that
notice of the hearing date is provided to the employee or his attorney. For the
purposes of this Section, an employee shall not be required to submit the dispute on
the issue of vocational services to mediation or go through a pretrial conference
before obtaining a hearing. The hearing shall be conducted as a rule to show cause.
* * *